Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1183
Act, how cited.

Sections 81-1183 to 81-1189 shall be known and may be cited as the State Government Recycling Management Act.

Laws 1990, LB 987, § 1;

R.S.Supp.,1990, § 81-1642.